West Virginia, session 2026, SB306.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Tax Department. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §11-10-5 of this code, relating to the Tax Department (Soft Drinks Tax, 110 CSR 19), is authorized.